Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-403.01
New comprehensive plan or full update; requirements.

When a city of the metropolitan class adopts a new comprehensive plan or a full update to an existing comprehensive plan, such plan or update shall include, but not be limited to, an energy element which: Assesses energy infrastructure and energy use by sector, including residential, commercial, and industrial sectors; evaluates utilization of renewable energy sources; and promotes energy conservation measures that benefit the community.

Laws 2010, LB997, § 1;

Laws 2020, LB731, § 1.